New York, session 2025-2026, S7237.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 59-d of the civil service law, as amended by chap- 2 ter 521 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 59-d. Public posting of employment opportunities. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section, the term "municipality" shall mean a village, 5 town, city, or county. 6 2. The department shall make publicly available on its website all 7 employment opportunities in the civil service of the state and informa- 8 tion on obtaining employment with the state, including, but not limited 9 to, vacancies in the competitive, non-competitive and labor jurisdic- 10 tional classes, announcements for upcoming open-competitive and promo- 11 tional examinations, test application instructions, and designations of 12 which employment opportunities are eligible to be filled by individuals 13 with disabilities and veterans with disabilities, including whether such 14 positions may be filled on a full-time or part-time basis, pursuant to 15 section fifty-five-b and section fifty-five-c, as amended by a chapter 16 of the laws of two thousand twenty-three, of this title. 17 3. The department shall provide municipalities in the state with the 18 ability to post municipal employment opportunities on the same website 19 of the department under which state civil service positions are posted 20 pursuant to subdivision two of this section, including all other rele- 21 vant information as described under subdivision two of this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10444-02-5 S. 7237--A 2 1 Such municipal employment opportunities shall be posted in a format 2 where job seekers may search by municipality and municipal employment 3 position type. 4 4. The president shall work in conjunction with the New York state 5 department of labor [and], the governor's office of employee relations, 6 and municipalities seeking to post municipal employment positions pursu- 7 ant to subdivision three of this section, in order to effectuate the 8 provisions of this section. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.